fst/morphology/affixes/verb_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VTA_IMP_PL
! Immediate
! 21 ->
+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>tânik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i%>hkik VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i%>hkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 21 ->
+Del+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>hkahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>hkêkok VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IMP_PL_DIM
! Immediate
! 21 ->
+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>tânik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>hkik VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>hkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 21 ->
+Del+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkêkok VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-t_IMP
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA-t_IMP_SG ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA-t_IMP_PL ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA-t_IMP_SG_DIM ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA-t_IMP_PL_DIM ;

LEXICON VTA-t_IMP_SG
! Immediate
! 2Sg ->
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>i%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 2Sg ->
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>â%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>â%>hkanik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-t_IMP_SG_DIM
! Immediate
! 2Sg ->
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:%>i%^DIMs VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 2Sg ->
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkanik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-t_IMP_PL
! Immediate
! 21 ->
+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>tânik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i2%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i2%>hkik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 21 ->
+Del+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>hkahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>hkêkok VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-t_IMP_PL_DIM
! Immediate
! 21 ->
+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>tânik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>hkik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 21 ->
+Del+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkêkok VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-i_IMP
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA-i_IMP_SG ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA-i_IMP_PL ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA-i_IMP_SG_DIM ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA-i_IMP_PL_DIM ;

LEXICON VTA-i_IMP_SG
! Immediate
! 2Sg ->
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>i%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 2Sg ->
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>â%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>â%>hkanik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-i_IMP_SG_DIM
! Immediate
! 2Sg ->
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 2Sg ->
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkanik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-i_IMP_PL
! Immediate
! 21 ->
+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>tânik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i2%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i2%>hkik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 21 ->
+Del+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>hkahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>hkêkok VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-i_IMP_PL_DIM
! Immediate
! 21 ->
+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>tânik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>hkik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 21 ->
+Del+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkêkok VERBS_Endlex ;


!! End lexica

LEXICON VERBS_Endlex
! @D.bound@ VERBS_Endlex_Morph ;
! @R.bound.h2@:@R.bound.h2@+Orth/Hyph # ;
! Only completed agentive and possessive constructions are allowed to pass
@D.agent@@D.poss@ VERBS_Endlex_Morph ;

LEXICON VERBS_Endlex_Morph
@R.err.Morph@+Err/Morph:@R.err.Morph@ # ;
@D.err.Morph@ # ;
